Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202560-676.01
Vulnerable road user, defined.

Vulnerable road user means:

(1) Any pedestrian who is:

(a) On a highway and constructing or repairing such highway;

(b) Working on utility facilities along a highway;

(c) Providing emergency services on or along a highway;

(d) In a crosswalk; or

(e) On the shoulder;

(2) Any individual operating any of the following on or along a highway:

(a) Any bicycle;

(b) Any electric bicycle;

(c) Any motorcycle other than an autocycle;

(d) Any moped; or

(e) Any vehicle or device similar to any vehicle or device listed in subdivisions (2)(a) through (2)(d) of this section;

(3) Any individual who is riding any animal or driving any animal-drawn vehicle on or along a highway;

(4) Any individual operating an implement of husbandry, including a farm tractor, that is on or along a highway; and

(5) Any individual who is in a crosswalk or on a shoulder and who is on any:

(a) Coaster, skate, sled, ski, board, or toy vehicle;

(b) Electric personal assistive mobility device; or

(c) Wheelchair.

Laws 2025, LB530, § 25.